test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-aarga_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - ǟrga: # Noun 35 'eng /est härg/fin' - full paradigm
     ǟrga+N+Sg+Nom: ǟrga
     ǟrga+N+Sg+Gen: ǟrga
     ǟrga+N+Sg+Par: ärgõ
     ǟrga+N+Sg+Dat: ǟrgan
     ǟrga+N+Sg+Ins: ǟrgaks
     ǟrga+N+Sg+Ill: ärgõ
     ǟrga+N+Sg+Ela: ǟrgast
     ǟrga+N+Pl+Nom: ǟrgad
     ǟrga+N+Pl+Gen: ǟrgad
     ǟrga+N+Pl+Par: eŗgi
     ǟrga+N+Pl+Dat: ǟrgadõn
     ǟrga+N+Pl+Ins: ǟrgadõks
     ǟrga+N+Pl+Ill: [eŗgži, ǟrgiž]
     ǟrga+N+Pl+Ela: [eŗgšti, ǟrgist]
